Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2345
Metropolitan utilities district funds; depositories; limitation on amount.

No deposit shall be made in any designated bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution (1) in excess of the amount insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or (2) in excess of the obligation of the depository bond at the time any deposit of funds is made or during the period in which the deposit of funds remains in the depository. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1933, c. 95, § 2, p. 378;

Laws 1935, c. 6, § 1, p. 69;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2531;

R.S.1943, § 77-2345;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 57;

Laws 1992, LB 757, § 29;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 40;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 56;

Laws 2009, LB259, § 19.